Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.82.160

Criminal profiteering lien—Trustee's failure to comply, evasion of procedures or lien.

(1) A trustee who knowingly fails to comply with RCW 9A.82.130(1) is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

(2) A trustee who conveys title to real property after service of the notice as provided in RCW 9A.82.130(1) with the intent to evade the provisions of RCW 9A.82.100 or 9A.82.120 with respect to such property is guilty of a class C felony.

[ 2003 c 53 s 90; 2001 c 222 s 20. Prior: 1985 c 455 s 17; 1984 c 270 s 16.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.

Purpose—Effective date—2001 c 222: See notes following RCW 9A.82.001.